California statutes. Education Code
Written notices concerning tests, vacancies, transfer opportunities, and other selections of shifts, positions, assignments, classifications, or locations shall be posted at all work locations of employees who may be affected not later than 15 working days prior to the closing date of filing appropriate applications, together with the normal use of newspapers and bulletins for public notice for open or promotional vacancies. Whenever the subject of these notices may affect a probationary or permanent classified employee who will not be reporting at his or her work location during periods when the employee is not normally required to work, such as Christmas, Easter, summer recesses, and other paid or unpaid leaves of absences, including vacations, and who has previously requested notification, the notices shall be mailed to the employee. However, the failure of an employee to receive a notice shall not invalidate any procedure, if, in fact, the notice was placed in the mail and postage paid.

This section shall not apply to any community college district that publishes and distributes to all work locations examination bulletins at least once each month, provided that records of employee requests for transfer and change of location are maintained and that the names of all candidates for transfer and change of location to a vacancy are certified to the appointing authority along with names of appropriate applicants from employment lists.

The personnel commission shall establish procedures for the maintenance of employee requests for transfer, change of location, change of shift, and notification of forthcoming examinations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 214.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88098.

A regular employee who is determined by the governing board to be incapable of performing the duties of his or her class because of illness or injury may, at the discretion of the governing board, be assigned duties that he or she is capable of performing. The position to which the employee is assigned shall be subject to classification by the personnel commission, but the employee shall receive no increase in wage or salary because of his or her assignment to the position unless he or she is appointed from an eligibility list resulting from a competitive examination in the event that the position is classified and allocated to a higher wage or salary than that previously attained by the employee, he or she may be assigned to the position without competitive examination, but shall continue to receive the wage or salary of his or her former classification. If the position is classified and allocated to a lower wage or salary than that attained by the employee, he or she shall be paid the wage or salary appropriate to the position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 215.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88099.

The commission shall, by rule, provide for an open competitive examination and a promotional examination to be held at the same time for the position of business manager or for any other single position class which it declares to be at or above the level of business manager. It shall require that all educational and work experience requirements be developed to fit the needs of the position in such a manner that the position will attract competent and qualified applicants from within the classified service, among academic personnel, or other persons meeting the minimum requirements established for the position.

Such rule shall provide: (a) that all permanent employees of the district, classified and academic, who meet the established minimum qualifications, shall be eligible to compete in the examination as promotional candidates; (b) that promotional credits, including seniority credits, if any, shall be equally applicable to both classified and academic promotional candidates; (c) that eligibility lists resulting from such an open competitive and promotional examination shall be merged according to the order of the examination scores into a single eligibility list, after the scores of each candidate on the promotional list have been adjusted for promotional credits, including seniority credits, if any; and (d) that the examination for any such position shall not be construed to be an entrance level position examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 190.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88100.

The commission may by rule provide for the competition of academic employees of the governing board in promotional examinations for positions in the classified service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 191.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88101.

The commission shall, by rule, provide for an open competitive examination and a promotional examination to be held at the same time for the positions that existed or could be created, when the positions become available for competitive examination, under the provisions of subdivisions (m), (n), and (o) of former Section 13055 as those subdivisions existed prior to their repeal by action of the 1965 General Session of the Legislature.

The rule shall provide: (a) that all permanent employees of the district, classified and academic, who meet the established minimum qualifications, shall be eligible to compete in the examination as promotional candidates; (b) that promotional credits, including seniority credits, if any, shall be equally applicable to both classified and academic promotional candidates; (c) that eligibility lists resulting from such an open competitive and promotional examination shall be merged according to the order of the examination scores into a single eligibility list, after the scores of each candidate on the promotional list have been adjusted for promotional credits, including seniority credits, if any; and (d) that the examination for any such position shall not be construed to be an entrance level position examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 192.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88102.

In any community college district which has geographical boundaries encompassing more than 200 square miles and which divides the area it serves into smaller areas for assignment of classified personnel, when an eligibility list is exhausted in one assignment area but there are available eligibles in another assignment area, an area eligibility list may be established for the assignment area in which the eligibility list is exhausted. The life of such new area eligibility list shall be one year. Seniority for the purpose specified in Section 88127 shall continue to be districtwide.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88103.

When an open competitive examination and a promotional examination for a particular class are held at the same time, the commission may, prior to the examination, authorize certification for employment of candidates from the open competitive eligibility list before the promotional eligibility list has been exahausted if the candidate on the open list has a higher score before adjustment for preferential credits than the score of the highest available candidate on the promotional list after seniority credits have been added.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 535.)
-------------------------------------------

88104.

(a) When all of the positions in a class are reclassified to a higher class, the incumbents of the positions who have been in the class for two or more years may be reclassified with their positions by the personnel commission. When a portion of the positions within a class are reclassified to a higher class, an incumbent who has a continuous employment record of two or more years in one or more of the positions being reclassified may be reclassified with his or her position as provided by personnel commission rule.

(b) The basis for reclassification of the position shall be a gradual accretion of duties and not a sudden change occasioned by a reorganization or the assignment of completely new duties and responsibilities. Determinations as to gradual accretion shall be on the basis of guidelines provided by personnel commission rules.

(c) An employee who has been reclassified with his or her position is ineligible for subsequent reclassification with his or her position for a period of at least two years from the initial action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 181, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

88104.5.

No position classification or reclassification plan which would affect classified employees who are represented by a certified or recognized exclusive bargaining representative shall be adopted by the commission until the exclusive bargaining representative and the community college employer of the classified employees who would be affected have been given reasonable notice of the proposed classifications or reclassifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1514, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

88105.

Whenever the appointing power requires the appointment of a person to a position, the duration of which is not to exceed six months, or, in case of an appointment in lieu of an absent employee, is not to exceed the authorized absence of that employee, he or she shall submit a request in which the probable duration of the appointment is stated. Eligible persons shall be certified in accordance with their position on the appropriate employment list and their willingness to accept appointment to such a position as limited-term employees. Limited-term employees shall be subject to those conditions affecting status and tenure during and after the employment as the commission may by rule determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 217.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88106.

When no eligibility list exists for a position in the classified service, an employee may receive provisional appointments which may accumulate to a total of 90 working days. A 90-calendar-day interval shall then elapse during which the person will be ineligible to serve in any full-time provisional capacity. No person shall be employed in provisional capacities under a given governing board for a total of more than 126 working days in any one fiscal year, except that when no one is available on an appropriate eligibility list for a part-time position, as defined in Section 88076, successive 90 working days provisional appointments may be made to the part-time position for a total of more than 126 working days in any one fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88107.

The personnel commission may authorize the extension of a provisional employee’s assignment for a period not to exceed 36 working days, if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) An examination for the class was completed during the first 90 working days of his or her provisional assignment.

(b) Evidence satisfactory to the personnel commission is presented indicating all of the following:

(1) That an adequate recruitment effort has been and is being made.

(2) That extension of the provisional assignment is necessary to carry on vital functions of the district.

(3) That the position cannot be satisfactorily filled by use of other employment lists or procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 218.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88108.

Successive provisional appointments of 90 working days or less each may be made in any class in the absence of an appropriate eligibility list; provided, that continuous examination procedures for the class have been authorized by the commission. Such successive provisional appointments may be made and persons employed in temporary capacities under a given governing board for a total of more than six months in any one year. Such appointments may continue for the length of time for which they were made, but may not be extended if a certification can be made from an appropriate eligibility list. While this section is in effect, it shall supersede any other provisions of this article which are in conflict with this section, but only to the extent there is a conflict.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1011.)
-------------------------------------------

88109.

The appointing power may, to prevent the stoppage of public business when an actual emergency arises and persons on eligibility lists are not immediately available, make appointments for a period not to exceed 15 working days, in accordance with commission rule.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88110.

Combinations of successive eligibility lists may be made during their first year. Eligibles on lists established within the first year of the life of another list may be placed in the order of their relative excellence in the examination on the like list, if lists so merged have been promulgated under conditions and techniques which are sufficiently similar to preserve their competitive character.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88111.

The commission may by rule provide for the continuous examination of eligibles for classes of positions which the commission determines cannot be practicably filled by promotional examination only.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88112.

No questions relating to political or religious opinions or affiliations, or any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, shall be asked of any applicant, or any candidate whose name has been certified for appointment, nor shall any discrimination be exercised therefor, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 788, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

88113.

“Veteran” as used in this article means any person who has served in the United States armed forces in time of war, or national emergency declared by the President of the United States of America, and who has been discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable, proof of which shall be submitted to the commission at the time of the examination.

“Armed forces” means the United States Air Force, Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 379, Sec. 8.   (AB 1715)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

88114.

“Disabled veteran” as used in this article means any veteran, as defined in Section 88113, who is currently declared by the United States Veterans Administration to be 10 percent or more disabled as a result of service in the armed forces. Proof of disability shall be deemed conclusive if it is of record in the United States Veterans Administration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88115.

In the case of all entrance examinations, veterans with 30 days or more of service who become eligible for appointment by attaining the passing mark established for the examination, shall be allowed an additional credit of five points and disabled veterans shall be allowed an additional credit of 10 points, which shall be added to the percentages attained in the examinations by the veterans. Veterans shall be placed on eligible lists and be eligible for appointment in the order and on the basis of the percentages attained by them in examinations after the credit of five points, or 10 points in the case of disabled veterans, is added.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88116.

(a) Whenever, during the absence of an employee of a community college district or student body association operating under Sections 76060 to 76065, inclusive, in the active military service of the United States of America during any period of national emergency declared by the President of the United States of America, or during any war in which the United States of America is engaged, the position held by that employee at the time of his or her entrance into that military service is placed within the classified service of the district and an eligible list is established for that position through competitive examination, the employee shall, at his or her request made within six months after leaving the active military service under honorable conditions, be given immediately an examination of substantially the same character and scope as the competitive examination through which the original eligibility list was established. The grade secured by that employee in that examination shall be deemed to be the grade the employee would have secured had he or she taken the competitive examination as a veteran, and the employee shall be placed on the original eligibility list accordingly with all the rights and privileges to which he or she would have been entitled had he or she had that place on the original eligibility list at the time of its establishment.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any member of the Military Reserve or the National Guard who is called to active duty, either voluntarily or involuntarily, during any period of national emergency declared by the President of the United States of America, or during any war in which the United States of America is engaged, shall be entitled to any rights, in addition to the rights accorded under subdivision (a), that are accorded that member under the federal Veterans’ Reemployment Rights Law or any other applicable provision of federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

88117.

(a) A person laid off because of lack of work or lack of funds shall be eligible
 for reemployment for a period of 39 months
 as follows:

(1) The person’s reemployment shall take preference over new applicants.

(2) The person shall have the right to participate in promotional examinations within the district during the period of 39 months.

(3) If the person is reemployed in a new position and fails to complete the probationary period in the new position, he or she shall be returned to the reemployment list for the remainder of the 39-month period. The remaining time period shall be calculated as the time remaining in the 39-month period as of the date of reemployment.

(b) An employee who
 takes a voluntary demotion or a voluntary reduction in assigned time in lieu of layoff or to remain in his or her
 present position rather than be reclassified or reassigned, shall be granted the same rights as persons laid off and shall retain eligibility to be considered for reemployment for an additional period of up to 24 months, provided that the same tests of fitness under which the employee qualified for appointment to the class
 still apply. The personnel commission shall make the determination of the specific period of eligibility for reemployment on a class-by-class basis.

(c) An employee who takes a voluntary
 demotion or a voluntary reduction in assigned time in lieu of layoff shall be, at the option of the employee, returned to a position in his or her former class or to a position with increased assigned time as vacancies become available, and without limitation of time, but
 if there is a valid reemployment list the employee shall be ranked on that list in accordance with his or her proper seniority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 586, Sec. 2.   (AB 2307)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

88119.

Eligibility lists shall be established for a period of not less than one year except that when a list is exhausted for appointments to current vacancies, through use and eligibles being unavailable, the commission may, upon the recommendation of the officer charged with certifying eligibles, and after due notice to eligibles who may have made themselves unavailable for appointment, terminate it before a year has expired.

Eligibility lists may be established for a period of six months upon the approval of the personnel commission so long as the six months’ duration of such a list is noted in the recruitment bulletin announcing the examination. If a list is exhausted for appointments to current vacancies, through use and eligibles being unavailable, the commission may, upon the recommendation of the officer charged with certifying eligibles, and after due notice to eligibles who may have made themselves unavailable for appointment, terminate it before the expiration date.

A list may be extended for an additional period of one year or less in the discretion of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 572, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

88120.

(a) A person who has served an initial probationary period in a class not to exceed six months or 130 days of paid service, whichever is longer, as prescribed by the rules of the commission shall be deemed to be in the permanent classified service, except that the commission may establish a probationary period in a class not to exceed one year for classes designated by the commission as executive, administrative, or police classes. To receive permanent classified service status, each full-time peace officer and public safety dispatcher employed by a community college district operating a dispatch center certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training shall serve in a probationary status for a period not less than one year from their date of appointment to that full-time position.

(b) An employee shall not attain permanent status in the classified service until that employee has completed a probationary period in a class. A permanent employee who accepts a promotion and fails to complete the probationary period for that promotional classification shall be employed in the position from which the employee was promoted. In any case, the rules of the commission may provide for the exclusion of time while employees are on a leave of absence. The rights of appeal from disciplinary action before attainment of permanent status in the classified service shall be in accordance with Section 88124.

(c) To the extent that this section, as amended by Assembly Bill 275 of the 2021–22 Regular Session, conflicts with a provision of a collective bargaining agreement entered into by a public school employer and an exclusive bargaining representative before January 1, 2022,
 pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the changes made to this section by Assembly Bill 275 of the 2021–22 Regular Session shall not apply to the community college district until expiration or renewal of that collective bargaining agreement.

(d) To the extent that this section, as amended by Senate Bill 874 of the 2021–22 Regular Session, conflicts with a provision of a collective bargaining agreement entered into by a public school employer and an exclusive bargaining representative before January 1, 2023, pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the changes made to this section by Senate Bill 874 of the 2021–22 Regular Session shall not apply to the community college district until expiration or renewal of that collective bargaining agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   (SB 874)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

88121.

No person in the permanent classified service shall be demoted or removed except for reasonable cause designated by rule of the commission as detrimental to the efficiency of the service. This section shall not be construed to prevent layoffs for lack of work or lack of funds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88122.

In addition to any causes for suspension or dismissal which are designated by rule of the commission, employees in the classified service shall be suspended and dismissed in the manner provided by law for any one or more of the following causes:

(a) Knowing membership by the employee in the Communist Party.

(b) Conduct specified in Section 1028 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 45.   Effective June 11, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

88123.

For reasonable causes, an employee may be suspended without pay for not more than 30 days , except as provided in this section, or may be demoted or dismissed. In such case, the personnel director, shall within 10 days of the suspension, demotion, or dismissal, file written charges with the commission and give to the employee or deposit in the United States registered mail with postage prepaid, addressed to the employee at his or her last known place of address, a copy of the charges.

Whenever an employee of a community college district is charged with the commission of any sex offense, defined in Section 87010, or any narcotics offense, as defined in Section 87011, or a violation of Sections 11357 to 11361, inclusive, 11363, 11364, or 11377 to 11382, inclusive, insofar as such sections relate to, any controlled substances in paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 11056, or any controlled substances in subdivision (d) of Section 11054, except paragraphs (10), (11), (12), and (17) of such subdivision, of the Health and Safety Code by complaint, information, or indictment filed in a court of competent jurisdiction, the governing board of the district may immediately suspend the employee for a period of time extending for not more than 10 days after the date of the entry of the court judgment. However, the suspension may be extended beyond such 10-day period in case the governing board gives notice within such 10-day period that it will dismiss the employee 30 days after the service of the notice, unless the employee demands a hearing. An employee so suspended shall continue to be paid his or her regular salary during the period of the suspension if and during such time as he or she furnishes to the district a suitable bond, or other security acceptable to the governing board, as a guarantee that the employee will repay to the district the amount of salary so paid to him or her during the period of the suspension in case the employee is convicted of such charges, or the employee does not return to service after such period of suspension. If the judgment determines that the employee is not guilty of such charges, or if the complaint, information, or indictment is dismissed, the district shall reimburse the employee for the cost of the bond; or, if the employee has not elected to furnish such bond, the district shall pay to the employee his or her full compensation during the period of the suspension; provided the employee returns to service after such period of suspension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 514, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

88124.

Any employee in the permanent classified service who has been suspended, demoted, or dismissed may appeal to the commission within 14 days after receipt of a copy of the written charges by filing a written answer to the charges. Such an appeal is not available to an employee who is not in the permanent classified service except as provided by rules of the commission. An employee in the permanent classified service who has not served the time designated by the commission as probationary for the class may be demoted to the class from which promoted without recourse to an appeal or hearing by the commission, except as otherwise provided by rules of the commission; and provided, that such demotion does not result in the separation of the employee from the permanent classified service. Nothing in this section shall operate to alter the protections guaranteed under Section 88128.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88125.

The commission shall investigate the matter on appeal and may require further evidence from either party, and may, and upon request of an accused employee shall, order a hearing. The accused employee shall have the right to appear in person or with counsel and to be heard in his or her own defense. The decision shall not be subject to review by the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 220.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88126.

If the commission sustains the employee, it may order paid all or part of his or her full compensation from the time of suspension, demotion, or dismissal, and it shall order his or her reinstatement upon terms and conditions that it deems appropriate. The commission may modify the disciplinary action, but may not make the action more stringent than that approved by the board. In addition, the commission may direct any other action that it finds necessary to effect a just settlement of the appeal, including, but not limited to, compensation for all or part of the legitimate expenses incurred in pursuit of the appeal, seniority credit for off-duty time pending reinstatement, transfer or change of location of the employee, and expunction from the employee’s personnel record of disciplinary actions, cause, and charges that were not sustained by the commission. Upon receipt of the commission’s written decision, the board shall comply with its provisions. When the board has fully complied with the commission’s decision, it shall so notify the commission in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 221.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88127.

Classified employees shall be subject to layoff for lack of work or lack of funds. Whenever a classified employee is laid off, the order of layoff within the class shall be determined by length of service. The employee who has been employed the shortest time in the class, plus higher classes, shall be laid off first. Reemployment shall be in the reverse order of layoff.

For purposes of this section, for service commencing or continuing after July 1, 1971, “length of service” means all hours in paid status, whether during the school year, a holiday, recess, or any period that a school is in session or closed, but does not include any hours compensated solely on an overtime basis as provided for in Section 88027. Nothing in this section shall preclude the governing board of a community college district from entering into an agreement with the exclusive representative of the classified employees that defines “length of service” to mean the hire date.

If a governing board enters into an agreement with the exclusive representative of classified employees that defines “length of service” to mean the hire date, the governing board may define “length of service” to mean the hire date for a classification of employee not represented by any exclusive bargaining unit.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the granting of “length of service” credit for time spent on unpaid illness leave, or unpaid industrial accident leave. In addition, for military leave of absence, “length of service” credit shall be granted pursuant to Section 88116.

“Hours in paid status” shall not be interpreted to mean any service performed prior to entering into a probationary or permanent status in the classified service of the district except service in restricted positions as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

88128.

Any permanent classified employee of a community college district, who voluntarily resigns from his or her permanent classified position, may be reinstated or reemployed by the governing board of the district, within 39 months after the employee’s last day of paid service and without further competitive examination, to a position in his or her former classification as a permanent or limited-term employee, or as a permanent or limited-term employee in a related lower class or a lower class in which the employee formerly had permanent status.

If the governing board elects to reinstate or reemploy a person as a permanent employee under this section, it shall disregard the break in service of the employee and classify him or her as, and restore to the employee all of the rights, benefits and burdens of, a permanent employee in the class to which he or she is reinstated or reemployed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 222.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88129.

No warrant shall be drawn by or on behalf of the governing board of any district for the payment of any salary or wage to any employee in the classified service unless the assignment bears the certification of the personnel director that the person named in the assignment has been employed and assigned pursuant to this article and the rules of the commission.

Whenever the commission, after a public hearing, finds that any appointment has been made in violation of this article or the rules of the commission as they apply to examination procedures, the commission may order that no salary warrant shall thereafter be drawn to the employee so appointed, for services rendered after the date of said order. Any violation of this article or the rules of the commission as they apply to examination procedures shall constitute grounds for the dismissal of the employee or employees guilty of such violation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88130.

The commission may conduct hearings, subpoena witnesses, require the production of records or information pertinent to investigation, and may administer oaths. It may, at will, inspect any records of the governing board that may be necessary to satisfy itself that the procedures prescribed by the commission have been complied with. Hearings may be held by the commission on any subject to which its authority may extend as described in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88131.

The commission may authorize a hearing officer or other representative to conduct any hearing or investigation which the commission itself is authorized by this article to conduct. Any such authorized person conducting such hearing or investigation may administer oaths, subpoena and require the attendance of witnesses and the production of books or papers, and cause the depositions of witnesses to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for like depositions in civil cases in the superior court of this state under Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The commission may instruct such authorized representative to present findings or recommendations. The commission may accept, reject or amend any of the findings or recommendations of the said authorized representative. Any rejection or amendment of findings or recommendations shall be based either on a review of the transcript of the hearing or investigation or upon the results of such supplementary hearing or investigation as the commission may order.

The commission may employ by contract or as professional experts or otherwise any such hearing officers or other representatives and may adopt and amend such rules and procedures as may be necessary to effectuate this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

88132.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the legal counsel of the governing board shall aid and represent the commission in all legal matters. If the legal counsel does not respond to a written request by the commission for aid or representation within 15 working days of receipt of the written request, the legal counsel is deemed to have refused to aid or represent the commission in that matter.

(b) (1) The legal counsel shall refuse to represent the commission in circumstances in which the legal counsel knows, or has reason to know, that at the time the request is made a conflict exists between the interests of the
 commission and the interests of the governing board or the community college district.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a member of the commission may also declare that a conflict exists between the interests of the commission and the interests of the governing board or the community college district. A conflict shall not be found pursuant to this paragraph unless approved by a majority vote of the members of the commission.

(c) If the legal counsel or the commission
 finds that a conflict exists, or if the legal counsel otherwise refuses to aid or represent the commission in a legal matter, the commission may employ its own attorney, and the reasonable cost of the attorney shall constitute a legal charge against the general funds of the community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 48, Sec. 2.   (AB 2234)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

88136.

Any person who willfully, or through culpable negligence, violates this article is guilty of a misdemeanor. It is also unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Willfully, by himself or herself or in cooperation with another person, to defeat, deceive, or obstruct any person with respect to his or her right of examination, application, or employment under this article or commission rule.

(b) Willfully and falsely, to mark, grade, estimate, or report upon the examination or proper standing of any person examined or certified under this article or commission rule, or to aid in so doing, or to make any false representation concerning the same or the person examined.

(c) Willfully, to furnish to any person any special or secret information regarding contents of an examination for the purpose of either improving or injuring the prospects or chances of any person examined, or to be examined under this article or commission rule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 224.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88137.

In every community college district coterminous with the boundaries of a city and county, employees employed in nonacademic positions shall be employed, if the city and county has a charter providing for a merit system of employment, pursuant to the provisions of the charter providing for the system and shall, in all respects, be subject to, and have all rights granted by, those provisions; provided, however, that the governing board of the district shall have the right to fix the duties of all of its employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 193.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88138.

(a) A merit (civil service) system within a community college district may be terminated by one of the following methods:
